Illinois, session 104th, HB814.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Home Rule Cigarette Tax Restriction Act is 5amended by changing Section 0.01 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 140/0.01)  (from Ch. 120, par. 453.110)7    Sec. 0.01. This Article may be cited as the the Home Rule 8Cigarette Tax Restriction Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1324.)